District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-2413.11

Potomac water to be furnished to charitable institutions without charge.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 23, 1905, 33 Stat. 742, ch. 742, § 1
April 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-111, title III, § 306, 43 DCR 548

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1545.
1973 Ed., § 43-1533.

Editor's Notes

Repeal effective 90 days after meeting of Board: Section 306 of D.C. Law 11-111 repealed this section. However, § 601 of D.C. Law 11-111 provided that title III of the act shall apply 90 days after the initial meeting of the Board established by section 204 of the act.